Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-1243
Horseracing industry participants; legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that the horseracing industry is an important facet of economic and recreational development in Nebraska. Breeders, owners, and trainers are an important and integral part of the live horseracing industry in Nebraska.

Laws 1993, LB 471, § 5.